South Dakota, session 2026, SB67.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $4,205,497 from the general fund, to the special emergency
and disaster special revenue fund, for costs related to any emergency or disaster, as defined
in § 34-48A-1, impacting the state.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 3. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.395.14 2 67
An Act to make an appropriation for costs related to emergencies and disasters impacting the
state and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 67
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 67 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB67 ENROLLED